Louisiana, session 2026, SB328.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part II-A of Subchapter A of Chapter 5-F of Title 40 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1264 and 1264.1, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
PART II-A. LOUISIANA LIVING DONOR PAID LEAVE PROTECTION ACT
§1264. Citation; purpose; legislative intent
A. Citation. This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana
Living Donor Paid Leave Protection Act".
B. Purpose. The legislature declares that the purpose of this Part is all
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-202 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 328
of the following:
(1) To protect living organ donors from job insecurity or surgery delays.
(2) To encourage living organ donors, whose organs last longer and
function better than deceased donor organs.
(3) To keep Louisianians healthy, employed, and out of long-term state-
funded care, thereby saving the state thousands of dollars per patient each year.
C. Legislative intent. To facilitate living organ donors' return to
employment at a reasonable cost to the employer.
§1264.1. Definitions; paid leave for public-sector living organ donors; unlawful
practice by employers prohibited; relationship to other leave
A. As used in this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Employee" means a full-time employee of a state agency who
performs services for hire for an employer, for an average of twenty or more
hours per week, and who has been employed by the same employer for at least
twelve months. "Employee" does not include an independent contractor.
(2) "Employer" means a state agency or other governmental subdivision.
(3) "Human organ" means all or part of a liver, pancreas, kidney,
intestine, lung, or bone marrow.
(4) "Living organ donor" and "organ donor" mean a person who
knowingly and willingly donates all or part of a human organ while he or she
is alive for transplantation into another person.
(5) "Private employer" means a sole proprietor, corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, or other entity with one or more
employees. "Private employer" does not include a municipality, county, state
agency, institution of higher education, or other public employer.
(6) "State agency" means a department, agency, bureau, board, or
commission of any branch of state government.
B.(1) An employer shall grant paid leave of absence to an employee who
seeks to undergo a medical procedure to donate a human organ. The paid leave
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-202 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 328
of absence shall not exceed thirty working days, unless agreed to by the
employer. Paid leave granted under this Section shall be in addition to any
medical, vacation, military, jury duty, or other leave otherwise authorized by
law.
(2) The employer may require verification by a physician of the purpose
and length of each period of leave requested by the employee to donate a human
organ. If there is a medical determination that the employee does not qualify as
an organ donor, the paid leave of absence granted to the employee prior to that
medical determination is not forfeited.
(3) A private employer shall grant an employee an unpaid leave of
absence to allow the employee to serve as a human organ donor or a bone
marrow donor if the employee requests a leave of absence in writing.
(i) The length of the leave of absence shall be equal to the time requested
by the employee or thirty days, whichever is less.
(ii) A private employer may grant a paid or unpaid leave of absence for
a length of time greater than thirty days.
(iii) If a private employer agrees to pay the employee's regular salary or
wages during the leave of absence, then the private employer may be entitled to
a credit against the private employer's tax liability. The credit shall be equal to
twenty-five percent of the regular salary or wages paid to the employee while
the employee was on leave of absence. If the employer grants the employee a
leave of absence greater than thirty days, the credit provided for under this
Subsection shall be limited to the regular salary or wages paid during the first
thirty days of the leave of absence.
(iv) The provisions of Subsection (iii) of this Paragraph shall not apply
if the employee is eligible for leave pursuant to 29 U.S.C. 2601 et. seq., formally
known as the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.
C. No employee shall be discharged, demoted, suspended, threatened,
harassed, or discriminated against in any manner for requesting or obtaining
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-202 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 328
a leave of absence as provided by this Section.
D. This Section does not prevent an employer from providing leave for
living organ donations in addition to leave allowed under this Section. This
Section does not affect an employee's rights with respect to any other
employment benefit.
E. An employer may grant paid or unpaid leave for a period longer than
thirty working days.
F. The paid leave for organ donation authorized by this Section shall not
be used for retirement purposes.
G. The paid leave for organ donation authorized by this Section has no
cash value upon termination from employment.